Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Cross references. —

As to banks, banking and finance, see title 13.

As to corporations, partnerships and associations, see title 17.

As to unfair trade practices in insurance business, see §

26-13-101

et seq.

As to labor and employment, see title 27.

For Uniform Commercial Code, see title 34.1.

Former trade provisions unconstitutional. —

The former Fair Trade Act, Laws 1937, ch. 58, compiled as §§ 40-8 to 40-17, W.S. 1957, was unconstitutional. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disclosure of trade secret as abandonment of secrecy, 92 ALR3d 138.

Allegation of misconduct in prosecution of patent application as rendering subsequent patent action an “exception” case for purposes of 35 USC § 285, providing that in exceptional cases court may award reasonable attorneys' fees to prevailing party, 62 ALR Fed 733.

Propriety of federal court's exclusion of public from criminal or civil trial in order to protect trade secrets, 69 ALR Fed 892.

Access to confidential or privileged material in international trade cases under 19 USC § 1516a(b)(2)(B), 73 ALR Fed 247.

17A C.J.S Contracts §§ 267, 268